Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.220

Conditions and contracts of employment—Nonrenewal of provisional employees—Notice—Procedure.

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, every person employed by a school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract as provided in this section during the first three years of employment by such district, unless: (a) The employee has previously completed at least two years of certificated employment in another school district in the state of Washington, in which case the employee shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract pursuant to this section during the first year of employment with the new district; or (b) the employee has received an evaluation rating below level 2 on the four-level rating system established under RCW 28A.405.100 during the third year of employment, in which case the employee shall remain subject to the nonrenewal of the employment contract until the employee receives a level 2 rating; or (c) the school district superintendent may make a determination to remove an employee from provisional status if the employee has received one of the top two evaluation ratings during the second year of employment by the district. Employees as defined in this section shall hereinafter be referred to as "provisional employees."

(2) The superintendent of the school district may not renew the employment contract of a provisional employee licensed under the interstate teacher mobility compact in chapter 28A.420 RCW for a third year if the provisional employee has not yet completed both the issues of abuse course described in RCW 28A.410.035 and the equity-based school practices requirements under RCW 28A.410.277.

(3) In the event the superintendent of the school district determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by the end of the regular legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification shall state the reason or reasons for such determination. Such notice shall be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. The determination of the superintendent shall be subject to the evaluation requirements of RCW 28A.405.100.

(4) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or her request for reconsideration.

(5) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of directors shall consider any written communication which the provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any time prior to that meeting.

(6) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.

(7) This section applies to any person employed by a school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

[ 2024 c 317 s 14; 2016 c 85 s 2; 2012 c 35 s 7; 2010 c 235 s 203; 2009 c 57 s 2; 1996 c 201 s 2; 1992 c 141 s 103; 1990 c 33 s 391; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.67.072.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 85: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Effective date—2009 c 57: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Effective date—1992 c 141 s 103: "Section 103 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1992." [ 1992 c 141 s 105.]

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Savings—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.